Illinois, session 104th, HB3072.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Police Training Act is amended by 5changing Section 3 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 705/3)  (from Ch. 85, par. 503)7    Sec. 3. Board; composition; appointments; tenure; 8vacancies. 9    (a) The Board shall be composed of 18 members selected as 10follows: The Attorney General of the State of Illinois, the 11Director of the Illinois State Police, the Director of 12Corrections, the Superintendent of the Chicago Police 13Department, the Sheriff of Cook County, the Clerk of the 14Circuit Court of Cook County, one member of the Office of the 15Cook County Sheriff appointed by the Sheriff of Cook County, 16who shall serve as ex officio members, and the following to be 17appointed by the Governor: 2 mayors or village presidents of 18Illinois municipalities, 2 Illinois county sheriffs from 19counties other than Cook County, 2 managers of Illinois 20municipalities, 2 chiefs of municipal police departments in 21Illinois having no Superintendent of the Police Department on 22the Board, 2 citizens of Illinois who shall be members of an 23organized enforcement officers' association, one active member   HB3072- 2 -LRB104 11367 RTM 21455 b1of a statewide association representing sheriffs, and one 2active member of a statewide association representing 3municipal police chiefs. The appointments of the Governor 4shall be made on the first Monday of August in 1965 with 3 of 5the appointments to be for a period of one year, 3 for 2 years, 6and 3 for 3 years. Their successors shall be appointed in like 7manner for terms to expire the first Monday of August each 3 8years thereafter. All members shall serve until their 9respective successors are appointed and qualify. Vacancies 10shall be filled by the Governor for the unexpired terms. Any ex 11officio member may appoint a designee to the Board who shall 12have the same powers and immunities otherwise conferred to the 13member of the Board, including the power to vote and be counted 14toward quorum, so long as the member is not in attendance.15    (a-5) Within the Board is created a Review Committee. The 16Review Committee shall review disciplinary cases in which the 17Panel, the law enforcement officer, or the law enforcement 18agency file for reconsideration of a decertification decision 19made by the Board. The Review Committee shall be composed of 9 20annually rotating members from the Board appointed by the 21Board Chairman. One member of the Review Committee shall be 22designated by the Board Chairman as the Chair. The Review 23Committee shall sit in 3 member panels composed of one member 24representing law enforcement management, one member 25representing members of law enforcement, and one member who is 26not a current or former member of law enforcement.   HB3072- 3 -LRB104 11367 RTM 21455 b1    (b) When a Board member may have an actual, perceived, or 2potential conflict of interest or appearance of bias that 3could prevent the Board member from making a fair and 4impartial decision regarding decertification:5        (1) The Board member shall recuse himself or herself.6        (2) If the Board member fails to recuse himself or 7    herself, then the Board may, by a simple majority of the 8    remaining members, vote to recuse the Board member. Board 9    members who are found to have voted on a matter in which 10    they should have recused themselves may be removed from 11    the Board by the Governor.12    A conflict of interest or appearance of bias may include, 13but is not limited to, matters where one of the following is a 14party to a decision on a decertification or formal complaint: 15someone with whom the member has an employment relationship; 16any of the following relatives: spouse, parents, children, 17adopted children, legal wards, stepchildren, step parents, 18step siblings, half siblings, siblings, parents-in-law, 19siblings-in-law, children-in-law, aunts, uncles, nieces, and 20nephews; a friend; or a member of a professional organization, 21association, or a union in which the member now actively 22serves.23    (c) A vacancy in members does not prevent a quorum of the 24remaining sitting members from exercising all rights and 25performing all duties of the Board.26    (d) An individual serving on the Board shall not also   HB3072- 4 -LRB104 11367 RTM 21455 b1serve on the Panel. 2(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 3102-694, eff. 1-7-22.)